tr: Misina kullanım amacı: Dizgin ipi; Güç azaltma ipi; Ön uçuş ipi; İniş ipi; Kılavuz ipi; Tasma ipi; Pigtail/konektör; Arka uçuş ipi; Ayar ipi; Diğer
es: Propósito de la línea: Línea de brida; Línea de despotenciación; Línea de vuelo delantera; Línea de aterrizaje; Línea principal; Línea de seguridad; Pigtail/conector; Línea de vuelo trasera; Línea de ajuste; Otro
pt-BR: Finalidade da linha: Linha de freio (bridle); Linha de redução de força (depower); Linha de voo frontal; Linha de pouso; Linha principal; Corda de leash; Cabo chicote/conector; Linha de voo traseira; Linha de trimagem; Outro
lt-LT: Valo paskirtis: Pakabos lynas; Galios mažinimo lynas (Depower); Priekinis skrydžio lynas; Nusileidimo lynas; Pagrindinis lynas; Saugos lynas (Leash); Surišėjas / jungtis; Galinis skrydžio lynas; Reguliavimo lynas (Trim); Kita
cs: Účel linky: Vyvazovací šňůra; Depower šňůra; Přední nosná šňůra; Přistávací šňůra; Návazcová šňůra; Bezpečnostní šňůra (leash); Pigtail/konektor; Zadní řídicí šňůra; Trimovací šňůra; Jiné
nl: Lijn doel: Bridle-lijn; Depower-lijn; Voorste vlieglijn; Landingslijn; Leader-lijn; Leash-lijn; Pigtail/connector; Achterste vlieglijn; Trimlijn; Overige
nb: Formål for snor: Hanefotline; Depower-line; Fremre flyline; Landingsline; Fortom; Sikkerhetsline; Pigtail / kobling; Bakre flyline; Trimline; Annet
zh-TW: 線材用途: 風箏繫繩; 減力繩; 前飛行繩; 降落繩; 導線; 牽引繩; 連接短繩/連接器; 後飛行繩; 調整繩; 其他
ja: ライン用途: ブライドルライン; デパワーライン; フロントフライングライン; ランディングライン; リーダーライン; リーシュライン; ピッグテール/コネクター; リアフライングライン; トリムライン; その他
pt-PT: Finalidade da linha: Linha de suspensão; Linha de depower; Linha de voo frontal; Linha de aterragem; Linha guia; Linha de segurança; Pigtail/conector; Linha de voo traseira; Linha de ajuste; Outro
bg-BG: Предназначение на линията: Линия на юздата; Depower линия; Предна летяща линия; Линия за приземяване; Лидер линия; Линия за лийш; Пигтейл/конектор; Задна летяща линия; Трим линия; Друго
sv: Linans användningsområde: Kråkfotlina; Depower-lina; Främre flyglina; Landningslina; Tafs; Leashlina; Pigtail/koppling; Bakre flyglina; Trimlina; Övrigt
de: Leinenzweck: Waageleine; Depower-Leine; Frontleine; Landeleine; Vorfachleine; Leash-Leine; Pigtail/Verbindungsstück; Steuerleine; Trimmleine; Sonstige
th: วัตถุประสงค์ของสาย: สายไบรเดิล; สายดีพาวเวอร์; สายฟลายอิ้งหน้า; สายแลนดิ้ง; สายชิ่ง; สายรั้ง; พิกเทล/ขั้วต่อ; สายฟลายอิ้งหลัง; สายทริม; อื่นๆ
ko: 낚싯줄 용도: 브리들 라인; 디파워 라인; 프런트 플라잉 라인; 랜딩 라인; 리더 라인; 리시 라인; 피그테일/커넥터; 리어 플라잉 라인; 트림 라인; 기타
it: Scopo della lenza: Linea della briglia; Linea del depower; Linea di volo anteriore; Linea di atterraggio; Terminale; Linea del leash; Codino/connettore; Linea di volo posteriore; Linea di trim; Altro
hr-HR: Svrha linije: Bridle linija; Depower linija; Prednja leteća linija; Linija za slijetanje; Leader linija; Leash linija; Pigtail / priključak; Stražnja leteća linija; Trim linija; Ostalo
sl-SI: Plovnost vrvice: Vrvice kupole; Depower vrvica; Sprednja leteča vrvica; Pristajalna vrvica; Predvrvica; Varnostna vrvica (leash); Priključek (pigtail); Zadnja leteča vrvica; Vrvica za trimanje; Drugo
en: Line purpose: Bridle line; Depower line; Front flying line; Landing line; Leader line; Leash line; Pigtail/connector; Rear flying line; Trim line; Other
zh-CN: 风筝线用途: 风筝提线; 减力绳; 前牵引线; 降落线; 前导线; 安全绳; 转接绳/连接器; 后牵引线; 微调线; 其他
vi: Mục đích của dòng: Dây lèo; Dây xả lực; Dây bay trước; Dây hạ cánh; Dây dẫn; Dây buộc an toàn; Dây nối/Đầu nối; Dây bay sau; Dây tinh chỉnh; Khác
el: Σκοπός σκοινιού: Σχοινί bridle; Σχοινί αποδυνάμωσης (depower); Μπροστινό σχοινί πτήσης; Σχοινί προσγείωσης; Προπορεύον σχοινί (leader); Σχοινί ασφαλείας (leash); Σύνδεσμος (pigtail); Πίσω σχοινί πτήσης; Σχοινί ρύθμισης (trim); Άλλο
ru: Назначение лески: Стропа расстроповки; Стропа дипауэра; Передняя стропа; Стропа для посадки; Лидерная стропа; Страховочный лиш; Пигтейл/коннектор; Задняя стропа; Стропа триммера; Другое
pl: Cel linii: Linka uzdy; Linka depower; Przednia linka nośna; Linka lądująca; Linka przyponowa; Linka leash; Konektor (pigtail); Tylna linka nośna; Linka trymera; Inne
da: Linjeformål: Bridle-line; Depower-line; Forreste flyveline; Landingsline; Styreline; Leash-line; Pigtail/connector; Bagerste flyveline; Trimline; Andet
hu: Zsinór rendeltetése: Kantárkötél; Depower kötél; Első repülőkötél; Leszállókötél; Előkötél; Pórázkötél; Pigtail / csatlakozó; Hátsó repülőkötél; Trimmkötél; Egyéb
fr: Objet de la ligne: Ligne de bridage; Ligne de depower; Ligne avant; Ligne d’atterrissage; Pré-lignes; Ligne de leash; Pigtail/connecteur; Ligne arrière; Ligne de trim; Autre
ro-RO: Scopul firului: Linie de frâu; Linie depower; Linie de zbor frontală; Linie de aterizare; Înaintaș / Linie principală; Linie leash; Pigtail/conector; Linie de zbor spate; Linie de reglaj; Altele
fi: Narun käyttötarkoitus: Bridle-naru; Tehonsäätönaru; Etunaru; Laskeutumisnaru; Esinaru; Karkuremmi; Saparo / liitin; Takanaru; Trimmisäätönaru; Muu
sk-SK: Účel linky: Výväzová šnúra; Depower šnúra; Predná nosná šnúra; Pristávacia šnúra; Vodiaca šnúra; Bezpečnostná šnúra (leash); Pigtail/konektor; Zadná nosná šnúra; Trimovacia šnúra; Iné